Colorado, session 2026A, HB1292.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add article 2.5 to title
22 as follows:
ARTICLE 2.5
Schools Receiving Funds from
Scholarship Granting Organizations
22-2.5-101. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS ARTICLE 2.5, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "PARENT" MEANS A BIOLOGICAL OR ADOPTIVE PARENT, LEGAL
GUARDIAN, OR ANY PERSON HAVING LEGAL OR PHYSICAL CUSTODY OF A
CHILD.
(2) "PARTICIPATING SCHOOL" MEANS A SCHOOL THAT ENROLLS A
STUDENT WHOSE EDUCATION-RELATED EXPENSES ARE PAID, IN WHOLE OR
IN PART, BY A SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION.
(3) "SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION" MEANS AN
ORGANIZATION THAT USES PUBLIC FUNDING OR TAX-FAVORED FUNDING TO
DISTRIBUTE SCHOLARSHIPS FOR A STUDENT'S EDUCATION-RELATED
EXPENSES.
-2- HB26-1292

(4) "SCHOOL" MEANS A PUBLIC OR NONPUBLIC SCHOOL.
(5) "STATE BOARD" MEANS THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION
CREATED AND EXISTING PURSUANT TO SECTION 1 OF ARTICLE IX OF THE
STATE CONSTITUTION.
(6) "TAX-FAVORED FUNDING" MEANS ANY MECHANISM, INCLUDING
A PROGRAM, ACCOUNT, CREDIT, DEDUCTION, DEFERRAL, OR OTHER
ARRANGEMENT UNDER FEDERAL TAX LAW, UNDER WHICH A
CONTRIBUTION, DISTRIBUTION, OR EXPENDITURE WAS USED TO PAY FOR OR
REIMBURSE EDUCATION-RELATED EXPENSES, THAT RESULTS IN A TAX
BENEFIT FOR THE DONOR, CONTRIBUTOR, STUDENT, STUDENT'S PARENT, OR
OTHER TAXPAYER.
22-2.5-102. State opt-in requirements for federal program.
IF THE STATE VOLUNTARILY ELECTS TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
FEDERAL PROGRAM THAT ALLOWS TAX-FAVORED FUNDING FOR A
CONTRIBUTION TO A SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION PURSUANT
TO THE FEDERAL "H.R. 1 OF THE 119TH CONGRESS (2025-2026), PUB.L.
119-21", AND ITS IMPLEMENTING REGULATIONS AND GUIDANCE, THEN THE
STATE SHALL INCLUDE ALL SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATIONS THAT
SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE FEDERAL "H.R. 1 OF THE 119TH
CONGRESS (2025-2026), PUB.L. 119-21", AND ITS IMPLEMENTING
REGULATIONS AND GUIDANCE, IN THE LIST OF SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING
ORGANIZATIONS THAT IT PROVIDES TO THE SECRETARY OF THE TREASURY.
22-2.5-103. Nondiscrimination.
(1) (a) A PARTICIPATING SCHOOL SHALL NOT DISCRIMINATE ON THE
BASIS OF ANY STUDENT'S, STUDENT'S PARENT'S, OR STUDENT'S FAMILY
MEMBER'S DISABILITY, SPECIAL EDUCATION STATUS, RACE, ETHNICITY,
RELIGION, CREED, COLOR, SEX, SEXUAL ORIENTATION, GENDER IDENTITY,
-3- HB26-1292

GENDER EXPRESSION, FAMILY COMPOSITION, AGE, NATIONAL ORIGIN,
ANCESTRY, LANGUAGE PROFICIENCY, OR SOCIOECONOMIC STATUS.
(b) THE PROHIBITION DESCRIBED IN THIS SUBSECTION (1) APPLIES
TO ALL CONDUCT BY A PARTICIPATING SCHOOL, INCLUDING ADMISSIONS,
ENROLLMENT, ACADEMIC PERFORMANCE, ACCESS TO OR PARTICIPATION IN
EDUCATIONAL SERVICES, AND RETENTION.
(2) A PARTICIPATING SCHOOL SHALL PUBLISH THE PROHIBITION
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION ON ITS PUBLIC-FACING
WEBSITE, ON ITS APPLICATION FOR ENROLLMENT, AND IN ANY
ENROLLMENT MATERIALS.
(3) (a) FOR ANY STUDENT, A PARTICIPATING SCHOOL SHALL
COMPLY WITH STATE AND FEDERAL LAWS CONCERNING STUDENTS WITH
DISABILITIES, INCLUDING:
(I) SECTION 504 OF THE FEDERAL "REHABILITATION ACT OF 1973",
29 U.S.C. SEC. 701 ET SEQ., AS AMENDED, AND ITS IMPLEMENTING
REGULATIONS;
(II) TITLE II OF THE FEDERAL "AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT
OF 1990", AS AMENDED, AND ITS IMPLEMENTING REGULATIONS;
(III) THE FEDERAL "INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES EDUCATION
ACT", 20 U.S.C. SEC. 1400 ET SEQ., AS AMENDED, AND ITS IMPLEMENTING
REGULATIONS; AND
(IV) THE "EXCEPTIONAL CHILDREN'S EDUCATIONAL ACT",
ARTICLE 20 OF THIS TITLE 22.
(b) A PARTICIPATING SCHOOL SHALL NOT CHARGE ADDITIONAL
TUITION OR FEES TO A STUDENT WHO REQUIRES ACCOMMODATIONS OR
SERVICES PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
(4) NOTWITHSTANDING A REQUIREMENT IN SUBSECTION (1) OR (3)
-4- HB26-1292

OF THIS SECTION, THIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT A PARTICIPATING
SCHOOL THAT IS A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL FROM:
(a) MAINTAINING ITS RELIGIOUS MISSION, CHARACTER,
GOVERNANCE, OR INSTRUCTIONAL PHILOSOPHY, OR FROM MAKING
EMPLOYMENT DECISIONS CONSISTENT WITH CONSTITUTIONAL
PROTECTIONS; OR
(b) OFFERING RELIGIOUS INSTRUCTION OR WORSHIP.
22-2.5-104. Oversight.
(1) IF A PARTICIPATING SCHOOL VIOLATES A REQUIREMENT OF THIS
ARTICLE 2.5:
(a) AN INJURED PARTY, OR A SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING
ORGANIZATION THAT DISTRIBUTED MONEY TO THE SCHOOL, MAY FILE AN
ACTION IN A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION SEEKING INJUNCTIVE
RELIEF THAT COMPELS THE SCHOOL TO COMPLY WITH THIS ARTICLE 2.5;
AND
(b) THE STATE BOARD, UPON FINDING THAT THE PARTICIPATING
SCHOOL VIOLATED A REQUIREMENT OF THIS ARTICLE 2.5, MAY SUSPEND
THE SCHOOL'S ELIGIBILITY TO RECEIVE MONEY FOR A STUDENT WHOSE
EDUCATION-RELATED EXPENSES ARE PAID, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, BY A
SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATION, FOR A PERIOD NOT TO EXCEED
FIVE YEARS.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
-5- HB26-1292

within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-6- HB26-1292